Utah statutes.
48-2c-1605.   Amended application for authority to transact business.
(1)  A foreign company authorized to transact business in this state shall
deliver an amended application for authority to transact business to the
division for filing if the foreign company changes:
(a)  its name or its assumed name;
(b)  the period of its duration; or
(c)  the state or country of its formation or organization.
(2)  The requirements of Section 48-2c-1604 for obtaining an original
application for authority to transact business apply to filing an amended
application for authority to transact business under this section.
